[1]         
Mr. O. is charged with three offences: (i)
sexual assault on his daughter, (ii) sexual interference with his daughter, and
(iii) exposing his daughter to sexually explicit material for the purpose of
facilitating the offence of sexual interference.  I will refer to his daughter in
this judgment as “M.A.”  I will refer to the charges collectively as allegations
of “sexual abuse.”
[2]         
Mr. O. denies the allegations and pleads not
guilty to the charges.
[3]         
The offences are alleged to have occurred
between January 1, 2018 and June 30, 2019. M.A. was 8 and 9 years old at the
time. Her parents had separated in late November 2017. She was living with her
mother and two brothers in the matrimonial home. She accuses her father of
abusing her sexually during visits to his apartment.
[4]         
M.A.’s parents had previously separated from
March 2017 to August 2017.  During that period, M.A. and her two brothers lived
with their father and paternal aunt in the matrimonial home. Their mother,
M.I., had been charged criminally for biting Mr. O.’s forearm during an
altercation in March 2017. Her bail conditions prohibited her from returning to
the matrimonial home. She returned on one occasion shortly after her arrest and
was charged with a breach of her conditions.
[5]         
During that first separation, on May 17, 2017, M.I.
commenced a family law Application. Her specific claims are not in evidence, but
parenting was an issue. She later abandoned the Application when the parties
reconciled in August 2017. M.I. moved back into the matrimonial home. There is
no evidence of how the criminal charges against her were resolved.
[6]         
Three months later, in late November 2017, Mr.
O.’s sister and then Mr. O. moved out of the matrimonial home (within about one
week of each other). He moved into a two-bedroom apartment. I heard conflicting
testimony about whether his sister lived with him or lived in a different unit
in the same building.
[7]         
Initially, M.I. would not allow the children to
spend time with Mr. O. at his apartment, so he started visiting them at their school.
He regularly signed the children out of school on lunch breaks and took them to
a nearby park. At other times, he ate lunch with them in a conference room at
the school.
[8]         
M.A. alleges that he periodically signed her out
of school alone and brought her to his apartment over the lunch hour. She says
that is when the exposure to pornography and sexual touching started. Mr. O. not
only denies these criminal allegations, but he also denies ever being alone
with M.A. in his apartment.
[9]         
Mr. O. commenced a family law Application on
February 22, 2018. He sought an order for sole custody of the three children,
as well as child support, equalization of net family properties, and an order
for sale of the matrimonial home, which was owned by M.I. exclusively.  M.I. filed an Answer to his Application on April 5, 2018.  Her
claims are not in evidence, but parenting was a contested issue.
[10]      
After attending a Case Conference on June 28,
2018, Mr. O. and M.I. agreed to a parenting plan that
allowed the children to live with their mother in the matrimonial home and spend
overnights at their father’s house every weekend.  Mr. O. then abandoned his court
Application.
[11]      
The children’s weekend visits to Mr. O.’s
apartment started in July 2018. M.I. sometimes accompanied them for the visits,
and sometimes they went without her. Mr. O. and M.A. gave conflicting testimony
about how frequently M.I. was present.
[12]      
M.A. alleges that her father repeatedly sexually
assaulted her when she was taking showers at his apartment on Sundays.  Mr. O.
denies this allegation. He also denies ever being in the bathroom of his
apartment with M.A.
[13]      
The children’s weekend visits continued into the
following school year, from September 2018 to May 2019.  M.A. alleges that the
sexual assaults in the shower also continued.  Mr. O. was still volunteering at
the children’s school, and he continued to see them occasionally over lunch
breaks at the school, in addition to seeing them on weekends.  M.A. does not allege
that Mr. O. continued to sign her out of school alone during the 2018-2019
school year.
[14]      
In May 2019, M.I. decided that she would no
longer permit the children to visit their father’s apartment.  The weekend
visits ceased, but Mr. O. continued to see the children on lunch breaks at their
school.
[15]      
When the school year ended in June 2019, Mr. O.
had no opportunity to spend time with his children, so he attended one of his
son’s soccer games to see them.  M.I. told him to leave and they argued at the
soccer field.  The argument continued at a Tim Horton’s restaurant after the
soccer game. They parted ways and, a few days later, Mr. O. was charged by
police for allegedly punching M.I. He was released on an undertaking, with
conditions preventing him from contacting M.I. or being in her presence. His bail
conditions also prevented him from seeing the children, unless a family court
ordered otherwise, or he and M.I. agreed to a third party who would supervise
his parenting time.
[16]      
Mr. O. started another family court Application
in July 2019. There is no evidence of the specific relief sought, but parenting
was, once again, a contentious issue in the litigation. The family court proceeding
moved slowly. The parties attended court once in early 2020 and the judge appointed
the Ontario Children’s Lawyer to conduct a parenting assessment. Regular court
operations were then suspended in March 2020 due to the COVID-19 pandemic.  This
produced further delay in the proceeding.
[17]      
The criminal charge against Mr. O. was resolved
with a peace bond in July 2020. The terms of the bond prohibited him from
contacting M.I. for one year. They also prohibited him from seeing the children,
unless a mutually agreeable third party supervised his parenting time.
[18]      
Mr. O. testified that, during the periods of his
bail and of his peace bond, the only person that he could ask to perform the
parenting supervision task was his sister R.H., but M.I. would not agree to
her.  He therefore did not see his children throughout that time.
[19]      
The peace bond expired in or about July 2021. 
At that point, Mr. O. had not seen or communicated with the children for two
years. He revived the family law proceeding because M.I. was still resisting
his request for parenting time. Through correspondence between their lawyers,
they negotiated an agreement that Mr. O. would have parenting time at a
supervised access centre. He paid an initial deposit to the centre on March 14,
2022.
[20]      
Shortly thereafter, M.I. terminated her lawyer’s
retainer and advised Mr. O.’s lawyer that she wanted time to prepare the
children to see him. Prior to the first scheduled visit at the supervised
access centre, M.A. disclosed the allegations of sexual abuse to a Children’s
Aid Society worker and to her family doctor, then to the police. Her statement
to the police was video recorded on April 12, 2022. At trial, M.A. adopted the
content of the video, and I admitted the recording into evidence pursuant to s.
715.1 of the Criminal Code, R.S.C. 1985, c. C-46.
[21]      
Mr. O. was charged shortly thereafter.  He was
interviewed and gave a statement to the police on April 22, 2022.
[22]      
The supervised parenting time never took place. 
Apart from seeing M.A. testify at the preliminary inquiry in this case, Mr. O.
has not seen his children since the argument with M.I. at the Tim Horton’s
after the soccer game in July 2019.
[23]      
During her police interview, M.A. was asked how
things were in her home before her father moved out. She responded by stating
that her father was not nice. She described him as controlling and abusive toward
her, her brothers, and her mother. She said he would get triggered by the
smallest things. If her mother made a mistake, her parents would argue, and her
father would end up hurting her mother.  If she (M.A.) made a mistake, he would
yell and get violent with her. The officer asked her to explain what she meant
by “violent.” She responded, “He would slap me, hit me, punch me, drag me by
the hair.”  She said her mother would try to stop him, but he kept going on. She
said her brothers were also physically abused by her father.
[24]      
Although the video recording of M.A.’s police
interview was admitted as evidence in the trial, the admissibility of these
specific statements during the interview needs to be addressed separately. They
constitute presumptively inadmissible evidence that the accused engaged in criminal
conduct (i.e., domestic violence toward his wife and children) that is not the
subject of the charges before the court. The Crown filed an Application to
adduce this evidence of other discreditable conduct prior to the commencement of
the trial, but the parties agreed that the issue would be argued during closing
submissions at the end of the trial.
[25]      
Evidence of other discreditable conduct is
subject to a general exclusionary rule because of its inherently prejudicial
nature. However, it can be admitted if the Crown establishes that it is
relevant and material, and that its probative value outweighs its prejudicial
effect: R. v. B.(L.) (1997), 1997 CanLII 3187 (ON CA), 35 OR (3d) 35, 102 OAC 104 (ONCA) and R.
v. F.(D.S.) (1999), 1999 CanLII 3704 (ON CA), 43 OR (3d) 609, 169 DLR (4th) 639 (ONCA).
[26]      
Evidence is relevant if it has a tendency, as a
matter of logic and human experience, to make a disputed fact slightly more or
less probable through the application of everyday experience and common sense: 
R. v. Luciano, 2011 ONCA 89, at para. 204. Evidence is material if it is
directed at a fact in issue in a case.
[27]      
The evidence of the accused’s alleged family
violence is relevant and material to three issues in this case.  First, the
evidence of Mr. O.’s prior physical abuse of M.A., if accepted, helps to
establish a contextual narrative within which the sexual abuse is alleged to
have taken place. The true nature of the father-daughter relationship is a material
issue because it enables the court to evaluate the complainant’s testimony
fairly. Without the evidence of the accused’s alleged other physically abusive
conduct toward M.A., the court could be left with an incomplete and possibly
misleading impression of their relationship.
[28]      
There is support in the jurisprudence for this
finding. In several cases involving allegations of violence (including sexual
violence) between persons who have an ongoing relationship, the Court of Appeal
has approved the admission of evidence of other abusive conduct to assist the
trier of fact in understanding the dynamics of the relationship and the context
in which the charged violence allegedly occurred. See, for example, R. v.
Craigg, [1986] O.J. No. 2123 (Ont. C.A.), at p.1; R. v. Dovak,
[1989] O.J. No. 2499 (Ont. C.A.), at p.1, leave to appeal to S.C.C. refused,
[1990] 1 S.C.R. vii; and F. (D.S.), at para. 23.
[29]      
 The evidence of Mr. O.’s prior physical abuse
of M.A. is also relevant to the issue of whether he had a motive to commit the
charged offences. Motive is a form of circumstantial evidence which may,
depending on the facts of the case, assist the court in deciding the material
issues of whether the alleged criminal conduct happened, and whether it
occurred with the requisite intent.
[30]      
In cases involving violent behaviour between
non-strangers, courts have held that evidence of prior abusive conduct toward the
complainant (or deceased victim) is admissible for the purpose of demonstrating
the animus of the accused, which is relevant to the material issue of motive: F.
(D.S.), at paras. 23-24; R. v. Summerbell, [1996] O.J. No. 795 (Ont.
C.A.), at para. 2; R. v. MacDonald (1974), 1974 CanLII 1641 (ON CA), 20 CCC (2d) 144 (ON CA), at pp.
153-154; and R. v. Pheasant, [1995] O.J. no. 4962 (Ont. Gen. Div.), at
para. 20.  Such evidence is often admitted to demonstrate the accused’s
jealousy or strong feelings of hostility toward the complainant. In this case,
the evidence of prior physical abuse, if accepted, makes it more probable that
the accused had a need or desire to control and dominate M.A.
[31]      
The evidence of physically abusive behaviour
toward M.A., her brothers and her mother also provides important context in
which to assess the credibility of M.A.’s explanation for why she did not
disclose the alleged sexual abuse to anyone for approximately four years.  M.A.
stated that she kept her mouth shut because her father threatened to hurt her
and her family if she told anyone. She said he threatened to make her regret
it.  Mr. O. denies making these threats. The evidence of prior domestic violence
is not relevant to the issue of whether the threats were uttered. However, if I
find that Mr. O. threatened M.A., then the evidence of domestic violence is
relevant to the issue of whether M.A. would have taken his threats seriously
and consequently remained silent about the sexual abuse.
[32]      
Having established that the disputed evidence is
both relevant and material, the Crown must show that its probative value
outweighs its prejudicial effect. Probative value refers to the degree of
relevance to trial issues and the strength of the inference than can be drawn
from the evidence: R. v. Robertson, 1987 CanLII 61 (SCC), [1987] 1 S.C.R. 918, 39 DLR (4th)
321 at para. 43.  Prejudicial effect refers to the likelihood that the trier of
fact will misuse the evidence in a manner that unfairly disadvantages the Defence.
One of the recognized sources of potential unfair disadvantage is the operation
of moral prejudice, meaning the risk that the evidence will stigmatize the
accused as a “bad person” and cause the trier of fact to assess his guilt or
innocence based on an inference of general propensity or disposition: R. v.
Handy, 2002 SCC 56, at para. 100.
[33]      
The evidence of Mr. O.’s physical violence
toward members of his family has considerable probative value with respect to
the reason for M.A.’s delayed disclosure of the alleged sexual abuse. If I find
that Mr. O. threatened M.A., then the evidence of his other discreditable
conduct, if accepted, strongly tends to establish that M.A. had a reasonable
fear that her father’s threats of violence toward her and her family were
serious.
[34]      
The potential prejudice of admitting the disputed
evidence is low in the circumstances of this case. The evidence of family
violence, while serious, does not involve alleged conduct that is as egregious
or more egregious than the child sexual abuse allegations that form the subject
of the charges before the Court: Pheasant, at para. 19. The evidence of
family violence does not engender the same level of moral outrage as the
subject matter of the charges.  It is not inflammatory and therefore poses only
a minimal risk of moral prejudice.
[35]      
Furthermore, there is a low risk of inappropriate
propensity reasoning if the evidence is admitted. As Crown counsel submitted, many
physically abusive parents do not sexually abuse their children. Moreover, this
trial is being conducted without a jury.  As the trial judge, if I accept the
evidence of family violence as credible, I will be mindful of the impropriety
of inferring that Mr. O. is the type of person who would sexually abuse his
daughter or is more likely to have sexually abused his daughter, simply because
he physically abused her and other members of his family in the past.
[36]      
In summary, the probative value of the evidence
of other discreditable conduct outweighs its prejudicial effect.  It is
therefore admissible for the limited purposes outlined above.
[37]      
M.A. alleges that the sexual abuse started after
her father moved out of the family home. She says he picked her up from school once
or twice a week, although sometimes less often.  He signed her out of school and
brought her to his apartment over the lunch break. There was no one else
present when he brought her there.
[38]      
She says that he often played “nasty videos” on
a computer or iPad and told her to watch the videos thoroughly. The videos
involved naked adults kissing, mating, and making love. It made her
uncomfortable. She told him she wasn’t allowed to watch because her mother told
her not to, but he said her mother won’t find out. He told her she will soon
like it. Sometimes he stayed with her to watch but sometimes he left the room.
When he returned, he would question her about whether she watched the video, if
it was good, and if she liked it.
[39]      
M.A. recalls that, during these lunchtime breaks
from school, her father put makeup on her face, made her change her clothes
into revealing dresses, and played music and made her dance for him. He sat her
on his lap and hugged her tightly, which made her uncomfortable. He
complimented her appearance. He told her that her bottom is big and that soon
she will look much prettier. He touched her body inappropriately on her breasts
over top of her clothes, on her buttocks and on the front of her thighs. A few
times, he asked her to caress and rub his stomach and chest. After these visits
to his apartment, he returned her to school.
[40]      
M.A. testified that, when she and her brothers
started visiting their father on weekends, he regularly sexually assaulted her while
she was showering. She said she locked the bathroom door, but he somehow
managed to get in. He washed her body. She told him not to because she felt
uncomfortable. She was old enough that she did not need help washing, but he
got mad at her when she tried to wash herself. He yelled at her to move her
hands. He caressed her body in a way she did not like. He touched her chest
area and her vagina. She felt uncomfortable, and she told him to stop. He said
he was just washing her. She told him she did not want him to wash her. Sometimes
he just stood there and peeked through the shower curtains, which gave her
chills.
[41]      
Mr. O. testified that he was always a very
involved parent.  Before the breakdown of his marriage, he worked days and his
wife worked nights, so he was responsible for caring for the children in the
evenings and in the morning before school.  His eldest son, M.C., has an
intellectual and developmental disability, and requires extensive care.
[42]      
Mr. O. stated that when he left the matrimonial
home on November 25, 2017, he moved into a two-bedroom apartment with his
sister. In December 2017, he started going to the children’s school to meet
them on their lunch break. He continued doing so in January 2018. He called ahead
to let the school office staff know that he would be picking them up. In
February 2018, he started volunteering one or two days per week at the school,
mostly in his eldest son M.C.’s class. He continued to sign his kids out of
school over the lunch break on days when he was volunteering.
[43]      
Mr. O. testified that when he signed the
children out of school, they ate lunch together, and went for walks on a trail
in a nearby park. Sometimes M.C. had a doctor’s appointment and would not join
them, but he never signed M.A. out of school alone.  He always signed out at
least two children, and usually all three. He did not bring M.A., or any of the
children, to his apartment during lunch breaks.
[44]      
Mr. O. denies ever bringing M.A. to his
apartment alone. He denies ever showing her pornography, putting makeup on her,
dressing her in revealing dresses, making her dance for him, or touching her inappropriately.
[45]      
Mr. O. testified that, when the children started
visiting him on weekends in July 2018, their mother almost always came with
them. There was only one or possibly two occasions between July 2018 and May
2019 when M.I. did not accompany the children to his apartment for the weekend.
[46]      
During these family visits, his sister would
sometimes go to a different unit in the apartment building to visit a friend.
But on the one or two occasions when M.I. did not accompany the children for a
weekend visit, his sister R.H. was present and helped him care for the
children.
[47]      
His bedroom in the apartment was small, with
just one bed, and the second bedroom was large. There were three beds in the
larger bedroom for his children. When they slept over on weekends, his sister
slept in the smaller bedroom and he and his ex-wife slept on the floor in the
larger bedroom with the three children.
[48]      
Mr. O.’s eldest child, M.C., was unable to
shower independently, so Mr. O. helped him shower. When the children visited
his apartment on weekends, J.B. (the youngest child) and M.A. showered on their
own while Mr. O. was busy doing other things. He never entered the bathroom
when M.A. was in there. He never peeked at M.A. from behind the shower curtain
while she was showering. He never touched or tried to wash her body while she
was in the shower. He is not aware of any way that the bathroom door could be
unlocked from the outside.
[49]      
M.A. was 8 and 9 years old at the time of the
alleged offences. She was 12 years old when she was interviewed by the police.
She was 15 years old when she testified in the trial.
[50]      
In evaluating the reliability and credibility of
her evidence, I am mindful of the Supreme Court’s direction to apply a common sense
approach to the assessment of the evidence of child witnesses: R. v. B.(G.),
1990 CanLII 7308 (SCC), [1990] 2 S.C.R. 30, at pp. 54-55; R. v. W.(R.), 1992 CanLII 56 (SCC), [1992] 2 S.C.R. 122, at
p.133. As Hourigan, J.A. explained in his dissenting decision in R. v. D.F.,
2023 ONCA 584, at para. 57 (which was later adopted by the Supreme Court at
2024 SCC 14):
[51]      
In this case, when M.A. told the police that her
father signed her out of school and took her to his house, the officer asked if
she remembered where his house was. She clarified that it was an apartment, but
said she was not sure where it was.  Her inability to remember the location of
the residence where she claims that the sexual offences occurred is not
surprising, given her young age at the time of the alleged incidents. She was
not living in the apartment and did not go there every day. She was driven
there in a car. She was not responsible for getting there on her own. When she
visited, she would not necessarily have been paying attention to directions, or
to the geography of the neighbourhood where her father lived. Her inability to
identify the location of her father’s apartment does not, in the circumstances,
detract from her credibility.
[52]      
There are numerous indicia of M.A.’s reliability
and credibility as a witness.  First, she demonstrated excellent recall of many
relevant facts, despite her young age and the amount of time that elapsed
between the dates of the alleged offences (January 2018 to June 2019), the date
of her police interview (April 12, 2022), and the dates of her testimony at trial
(July 29-31, 2024). Her recollection on several points was corroborated by
independent evidence, sometimes by Mr. O.’s testimony.
[53]      
For example, when M.A. was interviewed by the
police, the officer asked if she remembered the month and year when the sexual
abuse started. She did not know the month or year, but she recalled that her
father started signing her out of school over the lunch break after he moved
out of the family residence. She said it was probably when she was in grade 3
or 4.  The officer later asked if she remembered who her teacher was when her
father was signing her out of school, and she responded that she thought it was
“Miss S.”  Her school report cards confirm that Miss S. was her teacher in
grade 3 (and was not her teacher in grades 1, 2, 4 or 5.)  The report cards also
confirm that M.A. was enrolled in Miss S.’s class for the 2017-2018 school
year, which is the year that Mr. O. moved out of the matrimonial home and
started volunteering at the school.
[54]      
During M.A.’s testimony at trial, she was able
to recall the configuration of her father’s apartment and details about the family
room and the bathroom, where she alleges that the sexual abuse occurred. Her
testimony regarding the number of bedrooms and their layout relative to the
bathroom was consistent with Mr. O.’s evidence. Her testimony about the
sleeping arrangements during weekend visits was also consistent with his
evidence (i.e., that he would sleep in the same room with all three children). 
During her cross-examination, she remembered that the towels were usually kept
in the bathroom, that the shower curtain was not transparent, and that the bathroom
door locked from the inside by pushing the middle section of the doorknob.  Mr.
O. did not contest any of these facts; he specifically confirmed the nature of
the locking mechanism on the bathroom doorknob.
[55]      
M.A.’s testimony that her father put makeup on
her during school days between January and June 2018 is partially corroborated
by the evidence of her treating physician, Dr. Luthra. He testified at trial
and his clinical notes were marked as an exhibit. M.A. visited his office with
her mother, M.I., on May 11, 2018.  During that visit, M.I. relayed to him that
she observed lipstick on M.A. and was told by M.A. that Mr. O. put makeup on
her at his residence after picking her up from school alone, without her
siblings. Dr. Luthra testified that he examined M.A. and observed glitter on her
cheek and lipstick on her lips. He noted this observation in his file.
[56]      
M.I.’s out-of-court statements to Dr. Luthra are
not admissible for the truth of their contents. I will address the limited
purposes for which that evidence can be used later in this judgment. At this
stage of my decision, I am focusing exclusively on Dr. Luthra’s testimony that
he observed glitter and lipstick on M.A.’s face.
[57]      
The doctor’s personal observation of makeup on
M.A. is direct evidence of the fact that M.A. had some glitter on her cheek and
lipstick on her lips on the afternoon of a school day in mid May 2018. Dr.
Luthra’s evidence is therefore partially corroborative of M.A.’s testimony. It
is only partially corroborative because it does not assist the court in
determining who applied the makeup, or when or where it was applied.
[58]      
During M.A.’s interview with the police (on
April 12, 2022), the officer asked her whether her mother knew in 2018 that she
was going to her father’s apartment during school lunch breaks. M.A. recalled
that her mother found out one day when she noticed makeup on her face and asked
where it came from.  She said she told her mother that her father applied the
makeup but did not disclose the alleged sexual abuse to her mother.  This evidence
is corroborated by Dr. Luthra’s evidence regarding the visit to his office on
May 11, 2018.
[59]      
Another indicator of M.A.’s credibility is her
willingness to acknowledge things that she did not know or could not explain.
For example, when she was asked how her father entered the bathroom while she
was in the shower if the door was locked, she readily admitted that she has “no
idea” how he managed to get inside. She said she did not hear him trying to
break in.  She also said that she does not know whether he had a key or did
something to the lock because she did not see him do it. She explained that she
was behind the shower curtain whenever he entered the bathroom.
[60]      
M.A. made other reasonable concessions during
her testimony. For example, she told the police that her brothers were home in
their room when her father entered the bathroom while she was showering. During
her cross-examination at trial, she admitted (although she could not
specifically recall) that she probably left the bedroom door open when she went
to shower. She also admitted that her brothers might have been able to see the
bathroom door from inside the bedroom, depending on where they were in the
bedroom. She further acknowledged that she usually showered during daytime
hours when her brothers were not sleeping.
[61]      
M.A. was not evasive during this line of
questioning (or at any other time during her testimony). Her answers were
candid and directly responsive to the questions asked, even though the facts
she admitted are potentially helpful to the Defence argument that Mr. O. did
not have an opportunity to commit the alleged offences without detection.
[62]      
Defence counsel argues that there are material inconsistencies
in M.A.’s evidence. For the reasons that follow, I have concluded that most of
the purported inconsistencies are reconcilable, and that any true
inconsistencies are minor and inconsequential. They do not detract from the
reliability or credibility of her evidence.
[63]      
Defence counsel alleges that M.A. contradicted
herself about whether the bedroom door was open or closed when she showered at
her father’s apartment. This issue is relevant because a closed bedroom door
would have prevented her brothers from being able to observe her father
entering the bathroom. This issue is peripheral to the core allegations of
sexual abuse, but it is not inconsequential. An important element of Mr. O.’s
defence is that he did not ever have an opportunity to sexually assault M.A.
without detection because he was never alone with her.
[64]      
During her cross-examination at trial, M.A.
testified that she could not remember if the bedroom door was open or closed
when she showered. At the preliminary inquiry, she said the door was left wide
open. She acknowledged making that prior statement.  She explained, “When I
answered this question [at the preliminary inquiry], I assumed it was open
because, when I leave a room, I usually leave the door open. But I still don’t
remember if I opened or closed it.”
[65]      
M.A.’s evidence on this point is not directly
contradicted by her prior testimony at the preliminary inquiry. She did not
assert at trial that the bedroom door was always (or usually) closed. Rather,
she merely stated that she could not remember whether she left it open or
closed. Her two statements are therefore reconcilable.
[66]      
Defence counsel argues that M.A. contradicted
herself on the issue of whether she recalls happy times with her father.  When
she was interviewed by the police, she said, “overall, he didn’t give me any
good memories.” At trial, she adopted this prior statement and reaffirmed that
she did not have any good memories of him, even from before he moved out of the
family residence. She was then shown photographs of seemingly happy family
outings and copies of birthday greetings and Father’s Day greetings that she wrote
to him. She was challenged on her categorical statement that she did not have any
good memories. She acknowledged that she had developed some good memories with him,
but she nevertheless insisted that she was being truthful in her statement to
the police. She explained that “since the bad memories block out the good
memories,” she no longer considers the earlier memories to be good. This is a compelling
explanation that reconciles the superficial inconsistency in her statements
about how she remembers her relationship with her father.
[67]      
The next purported inconsistency in M.A.’s
evidence relates to the issue of who was present during the weekend visits to
her father’s apartment that started in July 2018. At trial, M.A. consistently
stated that she and her two brothers went to their father’s apartment together
on weekends. Defence counsel submits that M.A. gave a very different account to
the police, initially telling the officer that her father brought her to the
apartment alone on weekends, then later saying that her brothers would
sometimes accompany her on weekends. For the reasons set out below, I have
concluded that this is not an accurate characterization of M.A.’s statements to
the police.
[68]      
After detailing her allegations of what occurred
during the lunch hour visits at her father’s apartment, M.A. told the officer,
“There was also every Sundays that he would take me to his house, because he
was allowed at that time.” She then relayed to him particulars of her
allegations of sexual assault in the shower. At trial, Defence counsel read
this prior evidence back to her, stressing the word “me.” He suggested that she
told the officer she went alone to her father’s apartment on weekends, without
her brothers. M.A. said that’s not what she meant. She explained, “I meant that
during that time, he did take me to his house, but I forgot to specify that he did
also take my siblings.”
[69]      
There is ambiguity in M.A.’s statement to police
about who was present on Sundays, but viewed in the context of the flow of the
conversation with the officer, I accept her explanation as sincere and credible.
She had been speaking about the lunchtime visits that occurred during a period
when her father had no parenting time with the children. She then shifted to a
different period, when he had regular parenting time on weekends, and she
started to describe the shower sexual assaults that occurred after the
parenting arrangements changed.  She was focused on relaying details of what her
father did to her, so she was speaking about herself, and not about her
siblings. She did not intend to mislead the police by implying that her
siblings were not present during weekend visits. She simply did not mention her
brothers.
[70]      
Defence counsel also put to her another
statement that she made a bit later in the police interview, when the officer
asked her directly whether she and her brothers would go to their father’s
apartment together on Sundays, or whether she went alone. The transcript of her
police interview reflects that she responded as follows: “Some days, it had to
be my brothers too because he was supposed to take my siblings too.” During her
cross-examination, M.A. was shown the relevant portion of the transcript and she
confirmed that she said those words to the police.  Defence counsel then suggested
that she implied there were some days when her father took her and her brothers
on weekends, but some days he took her alone. M.A. responded, “That’s not
correct.”  Defence counsel then asked her what she meant when she said “some
days” her father had to take her brothers too.  She responded that some days
her mom would go along with them, but her father would always take her and her
siblings “because he had to take us every Saturdays and Sundays to his house.”
Defence counsel then asked M.A. why she did not say to the officer that her
father took her and her brothers all the time. M.A. responded that when she is
under pressure, or feels nervous or anxious, she tends not to say the right
thing.
[71]      
In closing submissions, Defence counsel argued
that there is a material inconsistency in the complainant’s evidence on this
point, which undermines her credibility.  Crown counsel submitted that the
inconsistency is insignificant because the complainant simply misspoke when
interviewed by the police but was otherwise consistent in her testimony that
she and her brothers visited her father’s apartment together on weekends.
[72]      
   After the conclusion of the trial, I reviewed
the video recording of M.A.’s police interview, which forms part of her
evidence-in-chief. When I listened to the relevant portion of the recording, I
heard the complainant say “Sundays”, rather than “Some days,” which
significantly alters the meaning of her statement and eliminates any
inconsistency in her evidence. I notified counsel that there might be an error
in the transcript of her police interview, and I reconveyed Court.  We listed
to the relevant portion of the video recording together in court, and I heard
submissions on the issue.
[73]      
I should note that M.A. was wearing a face mask
during the police interview, so her lips are not visible on the video
recording, but her voice is clear and not muffled.
[74]      
I have listened to the recording repeatedly and
have concluded that M.A. told the officer, “Sundays, it had to be my brothers
too, because he was supposed to take my siblings too.”  The transcript is
incorrect.
[75]      
I arrive at this conclusion for two reasons. 
First and foremost, the video recording (not the transcript) constitutes the
evidence. To my ear, when I play the video, I clearly hear the complainant say
“Sundays” and not “Some days.”
[76]      
Second, I note that the officer, who was seated
directly across from M.A. in the interview room, appears to have heard her say
“Sundays” and not “Some days”, because the interview proceeds on a shared
understanding that her brothers were present during the weekend visits. The
officer does not ask any follow-up questions about which days or how many days
she went alone versus days when she went with her brothers. Rather, he refers
to “the three of you guys” going to Mr. O.’s residence on “a typical Sunday” and
asks, “What would happen once you guys were there?” M.A. responds, “my siblings
stayed in their rooms, and then when I had to go take a shower, he would come
in.” At no time does M.A. suggest that she was ever in the shower at her
father’s house when her brothers were not present.
[77]      
I recognize that M.A. did not identify an error
in the transcript when it was shown to her during her cross-examination.  In
fact, she agreed that she said the words reflected in the transcript to the
police (i.e., “Some days it had to be my brothers too…”).  However, she also testified
that the statement was incorrect. She disagreed with the content of what was attributed
to her in the transcript and surmised that she must have misspoken because she
was feeling anxious during the police interview.
[78]      
M.A. did not have the benefit of hearing the
audio recording when she was asked whether she made the statement to the
police. The video had been played for her two days earlier, during a blended voir
dire to hear the Crown’s s. 715.1 Application, but the relevant portion of
the video was not replayed during her cross-examination. In the circumstances,
she cannot be expected to remember precisely what she said to the officer, and
it would be reasonable for her to assume that the official transcript
accurately reflected her words, even though she disagreed with what it said.  In
the circumstances, I find that her words were not accurately transcribed.  She
told the officer, “Sundays it had to be my brothers too.”
[79]      
After court was reconvened, Defence counsel
ultimately conceded the error in the transcript.  However, he maintained that
there was an inconsistency in M.A.’s evidence because she did not mention her
brothers’ participation in the weekend visits until the officer asked her
specifically whether they also went on Sundays. I have already addressed this
issue above.  I find that there was ambiguity but not inconsistency on this
point. The ambiguity was resolved as soon as the officer asked the clarifying
question.
[80]      
Finally, Defence counsel argues that M.A. gave
inconsistent testimony regarding the clothes she claims her father made her
wear when he brought her to his apartment during school lunch breaks. The first
time she mentioned this during her police interview, she said, “When we went to
his house, … he would change my clothes into a dress.” This statement is open
to two different interpretations: (i) that her father would change her clothes
into the same dress every visit, and (ii) that he would change her clothes into
a different dress on each visit. This lack of clarity amounts to ambiguity in
her evidence, but it does not constitute an internal contradiction that
diminishes her credibility. There is no indication that her ambiguity on this
issue was the product of deliberate evasiveness.
[81]      
Later in the police interview, M.A. gave
inconsistent statements on the topic of whether her father made her wear only
one dress or different dresses.  The officer asked M.A., “What kind of dresses
would he get you to wear?” She responded, “It was revealing dresses.” The
officer then asked her to “describe it" and she said, “It’s like
sleeveless. It’d be really revealing I guess you could see some of my chest.
And it’d be a bit short too.” The officer asked, “Would it be like shorts or
like a skirt?”  M.A. gestured with her hands across the top of her thighs and
said, “It would be like really short to here.” Then she added, “I don’t know
that much, I can’t describe the dress.” The officer later asked whether “these
pieces of clothing” were always at her dad’s house or whether she would take
them home. She answered, “no, it was always at his place.”
[82]      
During this exchange, M.A. shifted between the
plural (“dresses”) and the singular (“it”) in her description of the clothing, which
does amount to an inconsistency. However, that shift was prompted by the
phrasing of the officer’s questions, so it is not necessarily indicative of M.A.’s
inability to keep her story straight, as suggested by Defence counsel.  Drawing
an adverse inference against the credibility of a 12-year-old in these
circumstances would run afoul of the commonsense approach to assessing
children’s evidence.
[83]      
During M.A.’s cross-examination at trial, she
was asked to clarify whether she was claiming that her father dressed her up in
the same dress or in different dresses on different occasions.  She answered,
“I think it was different dresses, but I don’t remember much.”  Defence counsel
showed her the transcript of her police interview and put to her that she
described only one dress to the officer. She disagreed and noted that she mentioned
“revealing dresses” during the interview.  She said she was describing
more than one dress to the officer, but the dresses were the same: “most of
them sleeveless” and revealing her chest. She added, “it wasn’t too short but
wasn’t what I would usually wear so I described it as short.” At that point in
her testimony, she switched back and forth between the plural article “them” and
the singular pronoun “it” without prompting by anyone.
[84]      
To the extent that there is an internal
contradiction in M.A.’s evidence on this topic, it is trivial and does not detract
from her overall credibility. It relates to a minor ancillary issue. M.A. never
wavered in her assertion that her father made her change into more revealing
clothes when he took her to his apartment over the lunch hour. Any lack of
clarity or inconsistency in her evidence about the number of dresses he made
her wear is immaterial.
[85]      
M.A.’s inability to describe in greater detail the
clothing supplied by her father is not surprising given that four years had
passed when she was interviewed by police, and more than six years had passed
by the time she testified at trial.  It makes sense that, at the age of 8, when
the incidents allegedly occurred, what would have struck her most about the
clothing (and what she would retain in her memory years later) is simply that
it was more revealing than what she normally wore. A commonsense approach to
her evidence dictates that the lack of detail on this specific issue does not
detract from her overall credibility or reliability.
[86]      
Overall, M.A. demonstrated good recall of
salient facts. She was unshaken on cross-examination. She did not waver on any
of the core allegations of sexual abuse. Her account of the relevant events was
coherent, cogent, and convincing.
[87]      
The Crown argues that Mr. O.’s testimony should
be rejected in its entirety as not credible. Crown counsel submits that there
are numerous unexplained inconsistencies between his testimony at trial and statements
that he made to the police. She further submits that he refused to make
reasonable concessions during cross-examination and embellished his evidence
when confronted with uncomfortable facts, both of which are indicia of a lack
of credibility. She also argues that his evidence on some points was
implausible, and that he used elaborate stories to avoid answering difficult
questions.
[88]      
I share some of these concerns about Mr. O.’s credibility,
but I do not agree with the Crown’s submission that his evidence should be rejected
in its entirety. As set out below, I accept some of his evidence and reject
some of his evidence.
[89]      
In assessing any inconsistencies between Mr.
O.’s testimony at trial and his statement to the police in April 2022, I am
mindful that English is not his first language, and that he testified with the
benefit of a Dari interpreter, whereas his police interview was conducted in
English.  Dari is a dialect of Farsi, a language that Mr. O. also speaks and
understands.
[90]      
When a witness is interviewed in a language
other than their native tongue, they may misunderstand the meaning of questions
asked or overlook nuances in the questions due to a lack of fluency. Similarly,
when the witness responds to questions in a language other than their native
tongue, they may fail to convey their meaning.
[91]      
Even if the witness’s comprehension is excellent
and they can express themself reasonably well in the language of the interview,
there is a risk that they will provide fewer details and less complete answers
to questions than they would if they were speaking in their native tongue. Few
bilingual (or multilingual) speakers have equal command of their languages.
Words will sometimes escape the speaker when they are trying to express themself
in their second (or third) language, especially if they are under stress -- such
as in circumstances where they are being interviewed by the police for alleged
sexual offences against their child. Bilingual individuals are not always able
to communicate with the same degree of particularity that they can master when
speaking their first language. A witness interviewed in their second language
may therefore leave out certain details that they would otherwise include if
the interview were being conducted in their native tongue. In addition to a
potential shortage of vocabulary, it is not difficult to imagine how the cognitive
effort required to participate in an interview in a second language could
induce brevity in the interviewee’s answers. If the witness later testifies in
their first language, it would not be surprising for their answers to be more expansive
and detailed in court, given the ease with which they can express themselves
with the aid of an interpreter.
[92]      
For these reasons, the court should be cautious
not to automatically infer a lack of credibility from inconsistencies between
earlier statements made in a witness’s second language and the witness’s
testimony in their native tongue in court. The court should consider whether any
inconsistency is instead attributable to a language barrier. This is an
especially important consideration if the nature of the inconsistency is an
omission in the prior statement relative to the testimony in court.
[93]      
Mr. O. was born in Afghanistan and immigrated to
Canada in 2008.  He learned to speak English when he was working at a United
Nations office in Kabul. He did not formally study English in either
Afghanistan or Canada but picked it up from his surrounding environments.  He
testified that, by the time he volunteered in his children’s school in 2018, his
command of English was good enough that he was able to communicate with
teachers and administrators in the school, but he was still hoping to improve. When
he was interviewed by the police in April 2022, he was working part time for a
delivery service, where he communicated with his manager in Farsi.
[94]      
When Mr. O. was interviewed by the police, he
did not request a Farsi or Dari interpreter.  He testified that he was shocked to
learn of the charges against him and was feeling upset during the interview. He
could not believe what was happening. He said he was trying to calm down and
listen to the officer’s questions so that he understood what was being asked. Crown
counsel asked him whether he made an effort to be as comprehensive as possible in
his answers to the officer’s questions. He responded, “whatever I knew in
English, I was telling him that.”  He said he sometimes struggles with English vocabulary.
When he speaks English, he somehow cannot explain or say things exactly the way
he wants. There are words and idioms that he needs to use to be precise, but
they do not immediately come to mind when he speaks English. I accept this
evidence as both plausible and credible.
[95]      
 During Mr. O.’s cross-examination, Crown
counsel put to him several elements of his evidence in chief that he did not previously
mention during his police interview. For example, Mr. O. testified at trial that
his sister R.H. and his ex-wife M.I. did not get along. He explained that M.I. wanted
R.H. to pay rent to them when she resided with them in the matrimonial home. He
commented on the tension between the two women more than once during his examination-in-chief,
in a variety of different contexts, including M.I. not agreeing to allow R.H.
to supervise his parenting time after they separated.  However, he mentioned
none of this to the police officer who interviewed him.
[96]      
Another example relates to Mr. O.’s testimony
that the reason M.I. terminated his weekend visits with the children in May
2019 is because he refused her demand that he pay for a family vacation. He
also testified about the argument that ensued when he showed up at the soccer
field to see the children. When he was interviewed by the police, he said the
weekend parenting arrangement ended because of the criminal charges that were
laid after the argument at the soccer field. He did not mention to the officer
that, prior to attending the soccer field, M.I. had decided to terminate the
weekend visits because he refused to take them on vacation.
[97]      
A third example raised by the Crown relates to
Mr. O.’s testimony that he sometimes took only M.A. and his youngest son J.B.
out of school for lunch because his older son M.C. had doctor’s appointments.  Mr.
O. neglected to mention this to the police.  In fact, he told the police that
he always signed all 3 of his children out of school.
[98]      
During his cross-examination, Crown counsel
suggested to Mr. O. that he omitted these details when he spoke to the police
because they are not true. She accused him of fabricating new details to make
himself appear more balanced and believable at trial, and to bolster his
defence, which includes an argument that M.I. is controlling and manipulated M.A.
into fabricating false allegations of sexual abuse.  Mr. O. denied these accusations.
[99]      
I do not believe that these inconsistencies
between Mr. O.’s statement to the police and his testimony at trial reflect
poorly on his credibility. They are more in the nature of omissions than contradictions,
and there are several plausible reasons why he may have omitted certain facts during
his police interview: (i) he was not specifically asked certain questions that
were later put to him during his examination in court; (ii) he was speaking to
the officer in English without the benefit of an interpreter; and (iii) he was shocked
by the charges against him and was not thinking of every relevant detail at the
time of the interview.
[100]    Moreover, regardless of the language issue, I am mindful of the need
to tread carefully when drawing adverse credibility inferences from omissions
in an accused person’s statement to police, given that every accused has the
constitutional right to remain silent: R. v. A.G., 2015 ONCA 159, at
para. 30; Kiss, at paras. 46-49. In my view, the above-mentioned
omissions in Mr. O.’s police statement are not sufficiently material to treat
them as deficiencies in his credibility.
[101]    Mr. O. was cross-examined on the answers he gave to a series of
questions by the police about whether he ever washed M.A. or helped her
shower.  Mr. O. responded to the officer’s questions using the third person pronoun
“they,” which leaves the impression that he was speaking about all three
children.  If in fact he was referring to the three children, then his answers during
the police interview would directly contradict the testimony he gave at trial. 
However, Mr. O. explained that he understood the officer’s questions to be
about M.A. and he was answering with respect to her, but sometimes he makes
mistakes with singular and plural pronouns in English. Upon review of the
relevant portion of the transcript, I am satisfied by Mr. O.’s explanation that
a combination of stress and limited English proficiency contributed to the
appearance of an internal contradiction in his evidence, when in fact his
statements on this issue were not contradictory.
[102]    Crown counsel submits that Mr. O. gave elaborate and non-responsive
answers to uncomfortable questions both during his police interview and at
trial. She argues that the court should interpret this as a symptom of him
lying. For example, when he was asked by the officer if he ever brought M.A. to
his apartment during the school lunch break or after school, he said no, then
provided a long explanation. He stated that his ex-wife M.I. would not allow
him to bring the kids to his apartment after school; that he did not need to
take M.A. to his apartment because he was able to spend time with her at
school; that he did not have enough time to bring M.A. home during the lunch
break because it was only 35 minutes long; and that he did not want to take
M.A. away from her studies.
[103]    Mr. O. agreed with Crown counsel that the officer did not ask him why
he did not bring M.A. home from school, but rather simply whether he ever
brought her home.  However, he denied Crown counsel’s suggestion that he
provided an unnecessarily elaborate answer because he really wanted to hide the
fact that he did take M.A. home for lunch.
[104]    Given the seriousness of the charges he is facing, I am not troubled
by the somewhat defensive and elaborate way that he answered the officer’s
question about taking M.A. home from school. He cannot be faulted for trying to
supply the police with as much exculpatory information as possible, even if it
was not explicitly solicited by the officer.  I draw no negative inference
against his credibility based on this exchange.
[105]    There are, however, several other aspects of Mr. O.’s evidence that detract
from his credibility. The most significant are notable inconsistencies between his
testimony at trial and the statements that he made to the police about whether
his sister R.H. was living with him in 2018 and 2019, when the offences are
alleged to have been committed in his apartment.
[106]    During his examination-in-chief at trial, Mr. O. testified that he
lived with R.H. in his rented apartment after he separated from M.I. in late November
2017. He said they lived together until he moved from that apartment in
Brampton to Etobicoke. He later testified that he moved to Etobicoke in 2021. He
also stated that R.H. did not work outside the home because of her immigration
status.
[107]    Mr. O. testified that R.H. was always present in the apartment to
help him care for the children on the rare occasions when M.I. did not accompany
them for weekend visits.  He said R.H. would sometimes leave the apartment
during the day if M.I. was there, because they did not get along. However, he
asserted that R.H. would return to the apartment to sleep because she lived
there.
[108]    This evidence is relevant to Mr. O.’s defence.  If R.H. lived with
him from January to June 2018, and did not work outside the home, it would have
been risky (if not impossible) for him to bring M.A. home regularly during the
lunch hour and commit the alleged offences without his sister knowing what was
happening. Similarly, if R.H. lived with him from July 2018 to May 2019, and
was present in the apartment whenever M.I. did not participate in weekend
visits, it would have been difficult for him to sexually assault M.A. in the
shower without R.H. at least noticing that he was in the bathroom with her. Consequently,
if I accept Mr. O.’s testimony about the living arrangements, the circumstances
could give rise to reasonable doubt about whether there were opportunities for
the offences to be committed. I have therefore carefully examined all the
evidence on point to assess the credibility of Mr. O.’s testimony.
[109]    R.H. was not called as a witness at trial.  M.A. testified that R.H.
was not present when her father brought her home from school during lunch breaks
between January and June 2018. She said her aunt did not live there. She
testified that her father told her that her aunt lived in a different unit in
the same apartment building. Mr. O. did not specifically deny telling that to
M.A. (To be fair, he was not asked about it.) M.A. recalled sometimes seeing
her aunt when she and her siblings went for walks with their father at the park
near their school, but she was adamant that her aunt was never present in her
father’s apartment during the lunch time visits.
[110]     M.A. testified that she sometimes saw her aunt at the apartment
during weekend visits with her siblings. She acknowledges the possibility that
her aunt may have slept in one of the bedrooms in the apartment during one of
their weekend stays, but she does not remember that happening. M.A. asserted categorically
that her aunt was not living there in 2018 and 2019.
[111]    I reject M.O.’s testimony on this issue because it is contradicted
by prior inconsistent statements he made to police, and by a shift in his
evidence during his cross-examination. At one point during the police interview,
the officer asked him if the children had their own room. Mr. O. sought
clarification of whether the officer was referring to the family home or his
apartment. The officer specified the apartment, and asked, “where would they
stay when they would come visit you there? Let’s say for the weekend or a
couple days?”  Mr. O. responded, “No, no I didn’t bring it for the couple days
because that time my sister was there.  And one room for my sister was.”
[112]    It is clear from this exchange that Mr. O. was conveying to the officer
that there were no overnight stays because there was no space for the children
to sleep in the apartment with his sister occupying the second bedroom. This
directly contradicts the evidence he gave at trial, as well as M.A.’s testimony;
they both testified that the three children routinely stayed overnight at his
apartment on weekends between July 2018 to May 2019. At trial, Mr. O. described
sleeping arrangements that accommodated his sister, M.I., and all three
children, as well as himself.
[113]    When Mr. O. was cross-examined about this prior inconsistent
statement, he denied meaning to convey that there were no overnight visits. He testified
that he was trying to tell the officer that his children only stayed for the
weekend but not for a longer time because his sister was living there with him.
He denied the Crown’s suggestion that he lied to the police because he wanted to
avoid admitting that he saw his children consistently for at least two days on
weekends. He said, “I was just answering to what I was understanding of the
questions. And to the extent that I could understand the questions, I did reply.”
[114]    Based on my review of the relevant portion of the transcript, I do
not believe that Mr. O. misunderstood the officer’s question due to a language
barrier. He asked the officer to clarify the question before answering it. His
answer was responsive to the question and clear.  In this instance, I believe
that Mr. O. is using language proficiency as a pretext to try to escape
responsibility for a lie that he told to the police.
[115]    Notably, Mr. O. also contradicted himself on the issue of how long
his sister lived with him. In the early stages of his police interview, he was
asked some basic questions to obtain biographical information. He briefly
outlined the history of how he met his ex-wife and provided the address where
they resided during the marriage. He said he moved to an apartment in Brampton when
they separated, and he provided that address as well. The officer asked who he
lived with in the apartment. He responded, “just for a couple months my sister
live with me.”
[116]    Crown counsel cross-examined Mr. O. about the inconsistency between
his testimony that R.H. lived with him until he moved to Etobicoke in 2021 and
his statement to the police that she just lived with him for “a couple months”
after he separated from his wife in November 2017. Mr. O. responded by
asserting that, to his understanding, “a couple months” could mean 2 months or
9 months or almost a year.  He then added, “She lived with me intermittently. 
She left then she came back.”
[117]    Once again, I believe that Mr. O. is trying to use his limited English
fluency as a pretext to cover up a material inconsistency between what he told
the police and what he stated at trial.  I do not find it credible that he does
not (or did not in April 2022) know the meaning of the expression “a couple”
because he used the expression appropriately at other times during the police
interview. Moreover, he prefaced his answer to the officer with the word “just”
(“just for a couple months”), which suggests that he was intentionally conveying
to the officer that his sister did not live with him for long. It is unlikely
that he would have used the word “just” if he was intending to convey that she
lived there for 9-12 months.
[118]    Furthermore, even if I accepted Mr. O.’s explanation that, to his mind,
“a couple” could mean 9 months or almost a year, that is still materially inconsistent
with his testimony at trial that his sister lived with him from the end of
November 2017 until he moved to Etobicoke in 2021. I believe that Mr. O. lied
when he gave that evidence during the trial, then tried to mask the lie by
stating (for the first time, during cross-examination) that his sister lived
with him intermittently throughout that time.  I conclude that is also a lie.
[119]    R.H. may have lived with Mr. O. in the apartment for a brief period
in December 2017 and early January 2018 (as Mr. O. told the police), but I
accept as credible M.A.’s evidence that R.H. did not reside in the apartment
with Mr. O. by the time he started bringing her home for lunchtime visits. I conclude
that Mr. O. intentionally misled the court on this issue because he wants the
court to believe that there would not have been an opportunity for him to
commit the alleged offences in an apartment that he shared with his stay-at-home
sister.  This deliberate lie significantly detracts from his overall
credibility.
[120]    There are three other aspects of Mr. O.’s evidence that undermine his
credibility. They involve further inconsistencies between what he told the
police and what he stated at trial.
[121]    Mr. O. testified during the trial that his son M.C. is not able to
shower himself independently because of his disability. He stated that he would
bathe M.C. when the children visited for the weekend. However, when he was
interviewed by the police, he twice asserted that he never bathed any of his
children.  He said he helped M.C. with his diaper but did not bathe him.
[122]    During his cross-examination, Mr. O. explained that the first time
the officer asked him if he ever helped any of his kids bathe, they had just
been discussing whether he ever washed M.A. or helped M.A. to wash herself in
the bathroom.  He said he answered “no” because he had in mind that they were still
talking specifically about M.A. and he did not pay close attention to the
phrasing of the officer’s question, which shifted the discussion from M.A. to
all three kids.  Upon review of the interview transcript, I find this this
explanation to be plausible.
[123]    However, the second time that the officer raised this topic during
the interview, the context was different, and the meaning of the question was clear.
They had been discussing the conditions of Mr. O.’s peace bond.  The officer
changed the subject and returned to the topic of bathing the children. He asked
Mr. O., “So, you’ve never given your daughter or your kids any baths?” Mr. O.
responded, “no.”  Even with a language barrier, it would be difficult to
mistake the officer’s disjunctive question for an inquiry about M.A. only.  I
believe that Mr. O. understood the question but answered it inaccurately with a
categorial “no” instead of acknowledging that he regularly bathed M.C.  It is
likely that he did so because of the particulars of the allegations against him
and his desire to distance himself from any suggestion that he touched any of
his children in the shower.
[124]    Similarly, when the officer asked Mr. O. if he ever washed M.A., he
said no “because they don’t have time to wash” and added that they are with
their mother all week so “they don’t need to wash them.”  I accept Mr. O.’s
evidence that he was speaking about M.A. at this point in the interview despite
incorrectly using the plural pronoun “they.” I make allowance for that language
issue. However, he was clearly conveying to the officer that M.A. did not
shower at his apartment because she did not have time to do so. He was also
conveying that she did not need to do so because she showered at her mother’s
house during the week.  This is directly contradicted by the testimony he gave
at trial.
[125]    At trial, Mr. O. recalled times during the children’s weekend visits
when he would tell M.A. to take a shower, or he would see her exit the bathroom
and she would tell him she had taken a shower.  He said this happened “all the
time.”  I infer that he concealed this information from the police during his
interview because he wanted to convey that there would have been no opportunity
for him to sexually assault M.A. in the shower at his apartment.
[126]    I recognize that Mr. O. did not waver in his denial of the criminal
accusations against him. The above-noted inconsistencies in his statements do
not pertain to the core allegations against him. But they constitute intentional
lies, either to the police or to the court, which makes them damaging to his
overall credibility.
[127]    Mr. O.’s credibility is further undermined by his unwillingness to
make reasonable concessions during his cross-examination.  Most notably, he
refused to admit an obvious fact about the lock on the bathroom door in his
apartment. He remembered that the doorknob had a push-button locking mechanism
from the inside. He could not recall whether there was a hole on the outside.
He denied having a metal rod or other device that could unlock the door from
the outside. His evidence up to that point was not unreasonable, but he then
refused to admit even the possibility that the lock could be opened from
the outside.  Although he could not remember whether the doorknob had a hole on
the outside, he insisted that it was not possible to unlock it from the
outside.
[128]    The above deficiencies in Mr. O.’s credibility significantly
diminish his trustworthiness as a witness. I reject much of his exculpatory
evidence on that basis.  Stacked beside M.A.’s evidence, his testimony does not
leave me with reasonable doubt about his guilt:   R. v. D. (J.J.R.),
2024 ONSC 4253, at para. 53, leave to appeal ref’d, 2007 CanLII 16771 (S.C.C.);
R. v. T.S., 2012 ONCA 289, at para. 79. However, the ultimate issue for
me to determine is not simply whether I believe all, some or none of Mr. O.’s
testimony but rather whether the evidence at trial, taken as a whole, leaves me
with reasonable doubt about his guilt:  R. v. W.(D.), 1991 CanLII 93 (SCC), [1991] 1 SCR 742.
[129]    I will turn now to five key issues that the Defence argues give rise
to reasonable doubt: (i) Was there opportunity for the offences to be
committed? (ii) What, if any, inference can be drawn from the fact that M.A.
did not disclose the alleged sexual abuse for almost four years? (iii) What, if
any, inference can be drawn from the fact that M.A. did not avoid her father
after the sexual abuse is alleged to have started? (iv) Did M.A. have a motive
to fabricate false allegations of sexual abuse against her father? (v) What, if
any, inference can be drawn from Crown’s decision not to call M.I. as a
witness?
[130]    I have already made a finding that Mr. O.’s sister, R.H., was not
living with him after January 2018.  If he took M.A. to his apartment over the
lunch hour on school days between February and June 2018, he would have had an
opportunity to show her pornographic videos and touch her inappropriately
because no one else was present.
[131]    Defence counsel argues that there was not sufficient time for Mr. O.
to sign M.A. out of school, drive her to his residence, play pornographic
videos, apply makeup to her face, change her clothes, make her dance for him
and sexually assault her, then wash the makeup off, change her clothes back,
and return her to school. The school had two nutrition breaks, and each were 40
minutes long. The drive between Mr. O.’s apartment and the school took about 10
minutes each way. I agree that there would not likely be sufficient time to do
all the above actions in the remaining 20 minutes of the break.  However, M.A.
did not allege that Mr. O. did all those things every time he brought her to
his house.  Sometimes he played pornographic videos. Sometimes he asked her to
dance for him.
[132]    Moreover, M.A. consistently stated that the lunchtime visits to her
father’s apartment lasted longer than the lunch break. When she was interviewed
by the police, after describing what her father did during the lunchtime visits
to his apartment, the officer asked her how long it would last. She responded,
“It will last an hour or two because I really can’t be that long in his house.
I have to go back to school.”
[133]    Given that M.A. was only 8 years old when the offences allegedly
occurred, and that four years passed before she was interviewed by the police, I
am mindful that her estimate of the duration of the alleged offences may not be
reliable. Children’s sense of time is not always accurate. Furthermore, with the
discomfort that she describes feeling, it is possible that the visits felt
longer than they actually were.  However, even if her time estimate may be
wrong, her evidence is that she clearly remembers being away from school for
longer than the lunch break.
[134]    Defence counsel argues that school Attendance Reports disprove
M.A.’s assertions that her father signed her out of school without her siblings,
and that she missed class time because of extended lunch breaks at his
apartment. She testified that this happened regularly during the second half of
her grade 3 year. School Attendance Reports show that M.A. was late returning
to class after lunch on only one afternoon (January 25, 2018) during that
period. The Reports also show that her older brother M.C. was absent from
school that day, and her younger brother J.B. was late that morning, but not
late in the afternoon.  In the Attendance Reports, this is the only date on
which M.A. was noted to be late returning from lunch while her brothers were
either away from school or on time.
[135]    I agree with Defence counsel that these records do not show a
pattern of M.A. being absent from school in the afternoons or arriving late to
school in the afternoons while her brothers were punctual and in attendance.  The
records therefore do not confirm M.A.’s testimony.
[136]    However, the records also do not contradict M.A.’s testimony. They do
not capture all the relevant information and are therefore not reliable
evidence, particularly with respect to student punctuality. I have reached this
conclusion based on the testimony of the school’s current principal, Lisa
Sarbadhikari, who was called as a witness by the Crown. She testified about the
school board’s safe arrival system, sign in/out practices, and attendance
record keeping. She described the attendance recording system as “imperfect.” Her
evidence, in summary, is as follows.
[137]    The Attendance Reports are generated by the school board’s Student
Information System (SIS). Office staff input data into the SIS in accordance
with information provided by classroom teachers. Attendance is taken by
teachers in their classrooms twice daily, at 8:35 AM and at 1:15 PM.  This
practice has been in effect for years.
[138]    There are two nutrition breaks during the school day, one from 10:35
AM to 11:15 AM and the other from 12:35 PM to 1:15 PM. Students must be signed
out by a parent before they leave school premises, including at lunch time. The
sign-out sheets are in a binder in the school office. Parents are also required
to sign the student back in if they return during school hours. These rules and
practices have been in effect for years.
[139]    In 2018, classroom attendance was being taken manually. Teachers
sent attendance folders to the office as soon as possible after classes
started, usually within 10 minutes (i.e., by 8:45 AM and 1:25 PM).  Office
staff would then call the parents of any student who was noted absent from class,
unless a parent had previously notified the school that the student would be
absent or late.
[140]    If a student arrived late to class in the morning or after a lunch
break, but arrived before attendance was taken, the teacher was supposed to
note “late” on the attendance sheet. However, Ms. Sarbadhikari testified that not
every teacher does so consistently, especially in the primary grades.  At
times, a student’s tardiness would therefore not be entered into the SIS
database by office staff.
[141]     Ms. Sarbadhikari testified that the data input to the SIS is not an
accurate record of student absence, attendance, and punctuality. She confirmed,
for example, that if a student were signed out by a parent at the beginning of
the 10:35 AM lunch break and signed back in 30 minutes late at 11:45 AM, that lateness
would not be captured in the SIS database because the second attendance call is
not done in classrooms until 1:15 PM.  In those circumstances, only the sign-in/out
sheets would capture information about the student’s tardiness. Ms.
Sarbadhikari explained that the school board has no policy or practice of
reconciling the sign-in/out sheets with the classroom attendance sheets or the
SIS system.
[142]    Ms. Sarbadhikari explained that the school board also has no record
retention policy with respect to sign-in/out sheets, so each school has its own
practice. She testified that, pursuant to a request from the police, a search
was conducted for the sign-in/out sheets at M.A.’s school for the 2017/2018
school year and none was located.
[143]    Based on the principal’s testimony, which I find to be credible and
reliable, I conclude that there are at least two circumstances in which M.A.
could have been signed out alone by her father on a regular basis over the
lunch hour, for more than 40 minutes, without that information being captured in
the SIS and without a safety call being made to M.I. First, Mr. O. could have
signed M.A. out at the beginning of the first nutrition break at 10:35 AM and
signed her back in later than 11:15 AM but before 1:15 PM.  Second, Mr. O. could
have signed M.A. out of class early, before the start of the second nutrition
break at 12:35 PM and signed her back in on time at the end of that nutrition
break at 1:15 PM.  In either of these scenarios, M.A. would be present in class
for both attendance calls and her missed class time would therefore not be captured
in the SIS database and would not be reflected on her Attendance Reports.
[144]    M.A. testified that her father always signed her out when he brought
her to his apartment. She told the police this happened during her lunch break
“or during class hours.” She said that twice at different points in the
interview. She also said her father would always bring her back to school. As
noted above, if Mr. O. signed M.A. out of school during class hours and
returned her at the end of her lunch break, the missed class time would not be
reflected in her Attendance Reports. The school records therefore neither
confirm nor contradict her evidence on this point.
[145]    When M.A. was cross-examined about her statement to the police, she
said, “I didn’t mean he would take me during class hours, what I meant is that
he would take me out at lunch and it would continue into class hours, so that’s
why I had absences, it was going into class hours.”  M.A. appears to misunderstand
how the school’s attendance recording system works.  As noted above, if Mr. O.
signed M.A. out of school at the start of the first nutrition break and
returned her to school late, but before the afternoon attendance call at 1:15
PM, that would not be reflected in her Attendance Reports.
[146]    M.A. consistently asserted that the visits to her father’s apartment
lasted longer than the lunch hour and caused her to miss class time.  She only
contradicted herself about whether she missed class time before or after
the lunch break. When she was asked to explain this inconsistency, she said she
was anxious during the police interview and must have misspoken when she told
the officer her father signed her out during class time (i.e., before the start
of the lunch break).
[147]    I note that M.A. was shown her report cards during her examination-in-chief
and was questioned about the number of absences noted on them. The report cards
reflect an unusually high number of absences in grade 3 relative to grades 1,
2, 4 and 5.  During closing submissions, Crown counsel argued that this
information could have caused M.A. self-doubt about the accuracy of the
statement she had given to police.  M.A. may have deduced from the numerous absences
on the grade 3 report card that she must have been wrong when she told the
police her father signed her out of class before the lunch break, and that he
must have returned her to school late after the afternoon attendance roll call
instead. This is a plausible explanation for the change in M.A.’s evidence on
this point, but it is entirely speculative.
[148]    I do not consider this inconsistency in M.A.’s testimony to be a
fatal or even serious flaw in her credibility or reliability because it is on a
peripheral issue.  She did not waver in the core allegations that her father
signed her out of school without her siblings in the middle of the day, that she
missed some class time because they went to his apartment for a longer period
than the lunch break, and that he showed her pornography and touched her for a
sexual purpose while in the apartment. Whether her father signed her out early
before the lunch break started or returned her to school late after the lunch
break ended is a peripheral issue of no consequence.
[149]    The important point is that the school Attendance Records do not
preclude the possibility that M.A. was regularly signed out of school for substantially
longer than 40 minutes. The Records therefore do not foreclose the possibility
that Mr. O. had time to commit the alleged offences at his apartment over the
lunch break.
[150]    I have considered that the school Attendance Reports reflect that
all three children were signed out of school by a parent at 12:45 PM on May 11,
2018. The Reports do not indicate which parent signed the children out, but it
must have been M.I. because it is undisputed that Mr. O. never took the three
children out of school for an entire afternoon. Both Mr. O. and M.A. testified
that he always returned them to school after lunch and signed them back in. The
fact that M.I. removed them from school on May 11, 2018 is not proof that she
(or M.A.) fabricated the story relayed to Dr. Luthra that same day, about Mr.
O. bringing M.A. to his home and applying makeup to her face. M.A. could have
gone to the apartment with her father over the first nutrition break and been
returned to school long before her mother picked her and her siblings up at
12:45 PM.
[151]    With respect to the allegations of sexual assault in the shower
during weekend visits starting in July 2018, the Defence argues that Mr. O. would
not have had an opportunity to commit the alleged criminal acts because M.A.
was never alone with him on weekends.  I am not persuaded by this argument for the
following reasons.
[152]    First, there were many opportunities for the alleged offences to be
committed without an adult in the environment. M.A. testified that her mother
did not routinely accompany her and her siblings on the weekends. She also
testified that her aunt did not live in her father’s apartment and was rarely
present when they visited on weekends. I accept this evidence as credible. For
reasons explained earlier, I believe that Mr. O. exaggerated the frequency of
M.I.’s presence on weekends and lied about his sister residing in the apartment
to try to bolster his defence.
[153]    Second, the presence of M.A.’s two brothers in the apartment does
not foreclose the possibility that the offences could have been committed, nor does
it reduce the likelihood that they were committed. M.A.’s eldest brother, M.C.,
has a developmental disability.  J.B., her younger brother, was only 7 years
old at the time.  Given their lack of maturity, the boys could have noticed Mr.
O. entering the washroom while M.A. was in the shower and not suspected that anything
inappropriate was going on, particularly since Mr. O. routinely assisted M.C.
with his showers. They also could have been preoccupied with games, screens, or
other activities and not even noticed what was happening in the bathroom.
[154]    In conclusion, the evidence with respect to opportunity does not
raise reasonable doubt about the commission of the alleged offences.
[155]    M.A. did not disclose her allegations of sexual abuse to anyone
until April 2022, more than four years after the alleged incidents started, and
almost three years after they ended.  She did, however, make a partial
disclosure of some related allegations to Dr. Luthra during a visit to his
office on May 11, 2018.
[156]    As noted earlier, Dr. Luthra observed makeup on M.A.’s face in his
office that day. He recalled that M.I. told him she noticed makeup on M.A. and
was told by M.A. that Mr. O. had picked her up from school without the other
children and put makeup on her. Dr. Luthra recalled speaking directly to M.A.,
in her mother’s presence, and asking her what happened. His clinical notes
record what M.A. told him about her father’s conduct that day. He testified
that she told him it was her dad’s idea to put the makeup on.  She said she
watched YouTube in the bedroom at her father’s apartment while he was in the
kitchen. She described how he put her on his lap, hugged her and kissed her on
both cheeks. She said she watched YouTube again with him in the room, and then
he washed her face.  She told Dr. Luthra that she did not change her clothes or
remove her clothes.
[157]    The rule against hearsay prohibits me from relying on Dr. Luthra’s evidence
about M.I.’s and M.A.’s out-of-court statements for the truth of their contents. 
In other words, I cannot rely on the doctor’s second-hand information about
what was said to him outside of court as proof that, on May 11, 2018, M.I.
observed lipstick on M.A., or as evidence that Mr. O. picked M.A. up from
school without her siblings that day, brought her to his apartment, applied
makeup to her face, sat her on his lap and hugged and kissed her on both cheeks.
[158]    During her cross-examination at trial, M.A. confirmed that she said
those things to Dr. Luthra during that visit to his office. To the extent that
there are similarities between what M.A. told Dr. Luthra in May 2018 and what
she later told the police about her father’s conduct, her prior statements to
the doctor are not admissible to corroborate her evidence about what transpired
at her father’s apartment. Prior consistent statements cannot be used to
bolster the credibility of her allegations because the repetition of a
statement does not make it more likely to be true: R. v. Dinardo, 2008
SCC 24, at para. 36.
[159]    The evidence of what M.A. told Dr. Luthra on May 11, 2018 is,
however, relevant and admissible for other limited purposes. First, it places
the timing of her initial partial disclosure in the context of the concurrent
family law proceeding between M.I. and Mr. O., which is relevant to the issue
of whether M.A. had a motive to fabricate false allegations. This is discussed
further below.
[160]    Second, the evidence of what M.A. told Dr. Luthra is also admissible
and relevant to the issue of recent fabrication, because it begs the question why
she did not disclose the sexual abuse to her family physician when she had the
opportunity to do so in May 2018. M.A. confirmed at trial that the alleged exposure
to pornographic videos and inappropriate sexual touching in her father’s
apartment started before that doctor’s visit. Therefore, her failure to mention
those details to the doctor when he asked her about what happened at her
father’s apartment calls for an explanation.
[161]    Finally, the evidence of what M.A. told Dr. Luthra is admissible and
relevant to the issue of her credibility, to the extent that it differs
from what she accused her father of doing when she spoke to the police four
years later. Her disclosure to Dr. Luthra included many of the ancillary
allegations, but none of the particulars of alleged criminal conduct. For
example, she told the doctor that she watched videos at her father’s apartment but
did not say they were sexually explicit. She said he sat her on his lap and
hugged and kissed her but did not say he touched her thighs, buttocks, and breast
area. These discrepancies also call for an explanation. In other words, Dr.
Luthra’s evidence about what M.A. told him in his office is admissible as a
prior inconsistent statement that can be used to impeach M.A.’s credibility.
[162]    In considering what, if any, inferences may be drawn from the
evidence of M.A.’s delayed disclosure of the sexual abuse allegations, I am
mindful of the caution and guidance provided by the Supreme Court of Canada in R.
v. D.D., 2000 SCC 43, at para. 65:
[163]    As noted earlier in this judgment, M.A. explained to the police that
she kept silent about what her father was doing to her because he threatened to
make her regret it if she told anyone. She said he threatened to harm her and
her family. During her re-examination in the trial, she was specifically asked why
she did not tell Dr. Luthra about the sexual abuse during the May 11, 2018
visit, at the same time as she disclosed some of his other conduct (e.g.,
bringing her home to his apartment alone, putting makeup on her face, making
her sit in his lap).  She responded, “I didn’t mention it because I just
couldn’t get myself to open up.”
[164]    Before evaluating the reasonableness of M.A.’s explanation for why
she withheld information from the doctor and for why she did not disclose the alleged
sexual abuse to anyone while it was happening or for three years after, I must first
determine the credibility of her evidence about her father’s threats and physical
violence.
[165]    Mr. O. denies threatening M.A. in 2018, or at any time.  He also denies
physically abusing her, his other children, or his spouse at any time. The
Defence adduced a video recording of an altercation that occurred inside the
family home in March 2017, when Mr. O. returned to the house after the police
had asked him to leave the night before due to a loud domestic disturbance. The
video was shot on Mr. O.’s cell phone.  It depicts M.I. biting his forearm,
while two of the children scream and cry, and one of the boys tries to pull Mr.
O.’s arm away from his mother’s mouth. Then the video shows Mr. O. slowly
retreating and leaving the premises without saying anything, as M.I. shouts at
him in a language other than English.
[166]    This cell phone video does not undermine the credibility of M.A.’s
allegation that Mr. O. was an abusive father and spouse. The video has no
probative value except with respect to the events of that day. Moreover, it has
limited value because it does not depict what transpired prior to the start of
the recording on Mr. O.’s cell phone. It shows that Mr. O. remained calm on
that occasion when his wife bit him. He knew that the event was being recorded
at the time.
[167]    I have previously outlined the reasons why I find M.A. to be a
credible and reliable witness. I accept her evidence about her father’s threats
and about his prior family violence.  I reject Mr. O.’s testimony on these
topics based, in part, on the deficiencies in his credibility (noted earlier in
this judgment), but also based on my acceptance of M.A.’s evidence on point as
coherent, consistent, and compelling.
[168]    Having concluded that Mr. O. physically assaulted both his children
and his wife in M.A.’s presence when he was residing in the matrimonial home
and having accepted M.A.’s evidence that her father threatened to hurt her and
her family if she told anyone what he was doing to her in his apartment, I find
that M.A.’s delay in disclosing the alleged sexual abuse is satisfactorily
explained. Her explanation is reasonable. She feared her father would act on
his threats if she told anyone what he was doing to her. Her inability to “open
up” to Dr. Luthra about the alleged sexual abuse is understandable and credible.
Her incremental disclosure does not detract from the credibility of her
allegations in these circumstances.
[169]    In sexual assault trials where the complainant and the accused have
a pre-existing relationship, the parties often adduce evidence of the
complainant’s avoidant behaviour or lack of avoidant behaviour. By avoidant
behaviour, I mean steps taken by the complainant after the alleged sexual
assault to avoid being in proximity to the accused, avoid being alone in his
presence, avoid communicating with him, or otherwise alter her behaviour toward
the accused to try to put some distance between herself and the alleged
perpetrator.
[170]    Trial judges must be cautious about drawing inferences from this
type of evidence because it constitutes an error of law to assess the
credibility of a complainant based on stereotypical views about how true victims
of sexual assault would or should behave: R. v.  A.B.A., 2019 ONCA 124,
at para. 5.  Victims of non-stranger sexual assault react and cope differently.
Some will immediately withdraw from any further contact or communication with
the perpetrator, others will continue to engage with the perpetrator as though
nothing happened, and others will react somewhere in between these two
extremes. There is no typical response against which a complainant’s reaction
can be measured to assess her credibility. Consequently, a complainant’s failure
to demonstrate avoidant behaviour “must not be the subject of any presumptive
adverse inference based upon now rejected stereotypical assumptions of how
persons (particularly children) react to acts of sexual abuse”: R. v.
A.R.J.D., 2017 ABCA 237, at paras. 42-44, aff’d 2018 SCC 6, at para. 2.
[171]    This does not mean that evidence of avoidant behaviour or evidence
of lack of avoidant behaviour is always irrelevant or inadmissible. It simply
means that certain inferences drawn from the evidence are impermissible because
they rely on debunked stereotypes.
[172]    In this case, I heard considerable evidence about M.A.’s attitude
and behaviour toward her father after he allegedly started to abuse her
sexually. Some of the evidence is disputed and some of it is uncontested.
[173]    The disputed evidence pertains to birthday cards and Father’s Day
cards that M.A. gave to him. M.A. acknowledged that she drew the pictures on the
cards and wrote the messages inside them. Their authenticity and authorship are
therefore not contested, but I heard contradictory evidence about the dates on
which they were created.  M.A. testified that she does not remember giving her
father any cards after he moved out of the family residence in November 2017,
so she believes all the cards were made before he left (i.e., before the sexual
abuse allegedly started).  Mr. O. testified that he received all but perhaps
one of the cards after he left the family residence in November 2017 (i.e., throughout
the period when the sexual abuse was allegedly happening).
[174]    The cards themselves are undated.  Upon review of their content, I
have concluded that at least one must have been created after Mr. O. left the
family home because it is for his 45th birthday, which occurred in
January 2018.  I have also concluded, on a balance of probabilities, that at
least two of the cards were created before Mr. O. left the family home. One Father’s
Day card contains a school photo of M.A. dated 2015/2016. It is unlikely that
M.A. would have used such a dated photo on a card created in June 2018 or June
2019.  In another Father’s Day card, M.A. wrote, “I love you because … you take
care of me when I’m sick your home and moms at work.”  This was likely written
at a time when M.A.’s parents were cohabiting and working opposite shifts.
[175]    It is impossible to discern from the content of the other cards when
they were created. It seems likely that at least some of them date from before
Mr. O. left the family home simply because there are so many cards.  M.A. only
had contact with her father up until June 2019, so there were limited occasions
on which she would have presented him with birthday or Father’s Day cards after
the marriage breakdown.
[176]    Crown counsel asked me to make negative findings about Mr. O.’s
credibility and Defence counsel asked me to make negative findings about M.A.’s
credibility based on their respective testimony regarding the dates of the
cards.  I decline to do so.  Neither of the witnesses took an unreasonable
position on this issue.  Given the passage of time, I would not expect either
of them to be able to remember with accuracy when each card was delivered.
[177]    Without knowing whether the cards were made before or after the
sexual abuse allegedly started, I cannot reasonably infer that they constitute
evidence of a lack of avoidant behaviour on M.A.’s part. I should note,
however, that even if I accepted Mr. O.’s testimony that the cards were created
during the period when the sexual abuse was allegedly happening, I would not infer
from them that M.A.’s allegations are less likely to be true.
[178]    M.A. testified that many of the Father’s Day cards were written in
school as classroom assignments, but she did not attempt to resile from the
sentiments expressed in them. Rather, she stated unreservedly, “I prepared
those cards because I did love my father at the time.”  She added, “I was a
child, so regardless of people who did me wrong, I still loved them.”  She was
referring to her father’s physical abuse, because she testified that the cards
were written before the sexual abuse started.  But her explanation applies
equally if the cards were written after the sexual abuse started.  It is both
plausible and credible that an 8-year-old or 9-year-old child would have
complicated and conflicted emotions, including strong feelings of love for a
parent who abuses them both physically and sexually.  For that reason, M.A.’s
expressions of love for her father (regardless of when the cards were made) do
not give rise to reasonable doubt about the veracity of her allegations.
[179]    Similarly, the credibility of M.A.’s allegations is not diminished
by other evidence of her non-avoidant behaviour, such as the fact that she
continued to go on walks with her father and her siblings on a trail close to
their school after the sexual abuse allegedly started.  To find otherwise would
invoke the discredited myth that a “true” victim of childhood sexual abuse will
always take concerted steps to avoid her abuser.
[180]    I note that there is one piece of evidence of avoidant behaviour in
this case. M.A. was cross-examined about a notation that Dr. Luthra made during
a visit to his office on April 11, 2018. M.A. and her mother attended that doctor’s
appointment together. It is undisputed that M.I. reported to the doctor that she
and Mr. O. were going through a separation, and that she had primary custody of
the children, but Mr. O. was going to their school to take them out for food or
eat with them in the conference room two or three times per week.  Dr. Luthra’s
clinical note states, among other things, “she doesn’t want to go to school and
be with her father.”
[181]    M.A. remembered telling the doctor she did not want to go to school
and be with her father. Dr. Luthra testified that he thought it was M.I. who
relayed M.A.’s concern to him, but he remarked that he did not note who was
speaking and therefore could not be certain. I accept M.A.’s clear recollection
that, in April 2018, she expressed her desire not to go to school and see her
father.
[182]    Her statement to that effect is admissible under the “state of mind”
exception to the rule against hearsay evidence. An exception to the hearsay
rule arises when a declarant’s out-of-court statement is adduced in order to
demonstrate the intentions, or state of mind, of the declarant at the time when
the statement was made. Two preconditions to admissibility apply. First, the
statement must be of a present existing state of mind. Second, the statement
must appear to have been made in a natural manner and not under circumstances
of suspicion:  R. v. Starr, 2000 SCC 40, at para. 168; R. v. Cote,
2018 ONCA 870, at para. 22.
[183]    In this case, M.A.’s statement to Dr. Luthra is adduced for the
purpose of demonstrating her state of mind at the time when the statement was
made.  Although the statement was uttered in the context of M.I. relaying to
the doctor that Mr. O. was going to the children’s school to take them out for
food, there is no evidence that M.A. was prompted, coached, or pressured to
make the statement, or was in any way influenced by M.I. to express her desire
not to go to school and see her father. The statement therefore does not appear
to have been made under circumstances of suspicion. The statement reveals a
state of mind that is consistent with a reaction to unwelcome sexual touching
by her father when he signed her out of school on weekdays.
[184]    The Defence argues that M.I. manipulated M.A. into making false allegations
against Mr. O. to gain advantage in the high-conflict family court proceeding. Defence
counsel submits that M.A. was vulnerable to this manipulation because she felt
resentment toward her father for abandoning the family and she had a strong impulse
to protect and support her mother.
[185]    The Defence has no burden to prove that M.I. had a motive to lie or
that she influenced M.A. to achieve her objective: Gerrard, at para. 4. The
existence or absence of a motive to lie is, however, a relevant factor to be
considered in determining whether there is reasonable doubt about Mr. O.’s
guilt: R. v. Hughes, 2017 ONCA 814, at paras. 4, 6-10.
[186]    As mentioned earlier, M.A. told the police she did not have any good
memories of her father from prior to when he left the family home. When Defence
counsel suggested that her memories of trips to the park with her father and
brothers were good memories, she responded, “They would have been good memories
to me if he did stay.” She then added that the bad memories had blocked out the
good memories in her mind.
[187]    Defence counsel argues that this comment by M.A. is evidence that
she harbours bitterness toward her father for abandoning the family. Taken in
context, I do not interpret the comment that way.  Rather, M.A. was conveying
that any good memories were erased by the trauma of the sexual abuse she
endured after her father left the family residence. She was expressing the
thought that, had he stayed – meaning, had the status quo remained in
effect – she would not have experienced sexual abuse and would still have happy
childhood memories.  She did not use those precise words, but I would not
expect a 15-year-old to do so.
[188]    At another point during her cross-examination, M.A. acknowledged
that, prior to her parents’ separation, Mr. O. prepared her lunches, killed
insects for her, cared for her when she was sick, and cheered her up when she
felt sad. However, she described these tasks as doing the “bare minimum” as a
father. When Defence counsel asked her what else Mr. O. should have been doing
as a father, she responded, “He should have been there for me all the time, a
great father and great husband to my mother. He shouldn’t have moved out.”
[189]    Defence counsel argues that this statement demonstrates M.A.’s resentment
toward her father for betraying her and her mother by leaving the family home. Taken
in the context of all her testimony in court, I do not interpret the statement
that way. Clearly, M.A. laments the fact that her father moved out, but that is
because his departure was the catalyst that transformed her relationship with
him into one of sexual exploitation and interference.
[190]    However, I agree with Defence counsel that M.A.’s mention of her
father not being a great husband to her mother provides insight into her
feelings about her parents’ marriage. She candidly acknowledged during her
cross-examination that she felt protective of her mother. Given her exposure to
Mr. O.’s history of intimate partner violence, this is not surprising. M.A.
confirmed that, when the family was still living together, she wanted to stop
her father when he was hurting her mother, but she was too little to be able to
do anything.  That protective instinct, combined with her young age at the time
of her parents’ separation, and the fact that she was almost exclusively in her
mother’s care, made her vulnerable to manipulation by her mother.
[191]    M.A. testified that she was aware in 2018 that some sort of court
proceeding was underway, but she was not aware of who initiated the proceeding
or what her parents’ respective positions were on the issues in dispute. She had
a vague understanding that parenting arrangements were at issue. She candidly
acknowledged that she was supportive of the idea that her mother should
continue to care of her and her siblings.  Her desire to remain in her mother’s
care could also have contributed to her vulnerability to manipulation in the
circumstances.
[192]    It is notable that the timing of M.A.’s comments to Dr. Luthra, and
the timing of her ultimate disclosure of the alleged sexual abuse to the police
coincide with pivotal points in the family court litigation. Both doctor’s
appointments (on April 11, 2018 and May 11, 2018) occurred shortly after M.I.
filed her answer to Mr. O.’s Application on April 5, 2018, and prior to the
parties’ first appearance in family court. The ultimate report to police (in
April 2022) occurred just as Mr. O. was about to resume parenting time with the
children after not seeing them for nearly 3 years.
[193]    As Harris J. recently noted in R. v. A.G., 2023 ONSC 6038 (not
yet reported), at para. 17, “The anger and frustration of a family breakdown
has been known to lead on occasion to criminal allegations that later prove
false. To allege criminal misconduct is a strong temptation in the heat of
family litigation” because criminal allegations of violence can serve as a
powerful weapon to gain leverage in family court proceedings:  Shaw v. Shaw,
2008 ONCJ 130, at para. 5; Gonzalez v. Trobradovic, 2014 ONSC 2468, at
paras. 32-34. For that reason, criminal allegations of family violence are
susceptible to abuse: R. v. Walters, 2024 ONSC 978, at paras. 7-8.
[194]    In this case, I cannot reasonably infer that M.I. had a motive to
fabricate false allegations of sexual abuse against Mr. O. simply because they
were embroiled in high conflict parenting litigation when the allegations
surfaced. There is, however, other evidence that supports such an inference.
[195]    First, it was not symptoms of illness that prompted M.I. to bring
M.A. to see Dr. Luthra in April and May 2018.  Rather, M.I. appears to have accompanied
M.A. to the doctor’s office to create a record of Mr. O.’s alleged misconduct
toward M.A. This pattern was repeated on April 4, 2022, when M.I. brought M.A.
to see Dr. Luthra again to discuss the recently disclosed allegations of sexual
abuse. (Dr. Luthra’s letter dated April 4, 2022, which summarizes their
discussion, was ruled inadmissible as a prior consistent statement.)
[196]    Second, Mr. O. testified that, in the winter and spring of 2018, M.I.
frequently kept the children out of school on the days when he volunteered at
the school. He said M.I. did this to prevent them from spending time with him. During
her cross-examination, M.A. denied that her mother kept them out of school to
separate them from their father. I accept Mr. O.’s evidence on this point
because it is corroborated by the school’s Attendance Reports, as explained
below. I find that M.A. was likely unaware of her mother’s agenda when she kept
the children at home, because the school absences did not effectively prevent them
from spending time with their father. It is undisputed that she and her
siblings went on many walks in the park with him over the lunch period in the
winter and fall of 2018.  Her mother’s tactics were therefore ineffective and
likely opaque in the mind of an 8-year-old child.
[197]    The school Attendance Reports show that all three children had
multiple full-day absences between February and June 2018. The frequency of M.A.’s
absences far exceeded the number of absences she had in previous school years and
in the first half of the 2017-2018 school year. The records confirm that the children’s
absences were approved by a parent, but do not indicate which parent. I infer
that it was M.I. who approved the absences because it is undisputed that Mr. O.
did not at any time take all three children out of school for a full day.
[198]    It is notable that Mr. O. requisitioned the children’s school Attendance
Reports back in June 2018, long before he was charged with sexual offences
against M.A. He explained that he did so to use the Reports as proof of M.I.’s
alienating behaviour in the family court proceeding. I accept his testimony on
this point as credible. It supports an inference that M.I. was actively interfering
with his ability to see the children. It also underscores the high-conflict
nature of the parenting dispute and demonstrates the lengths to which M.I.
would go to prevent Mr. O. from having a relationship with them.
[199]    Finally, Mr. O. adduced other evidence about M.I.’s conduct toward
him over the years, which Defence counsel characterizes as deceitful and
controlling. With respect to the incident when M.I. bit him in March 2017, Mr.
O. said she had locked him out of the house by barricading the front door with
furniture. He also testified about how, during the temporary separation that
followed (from March to August 2017), he learned through DNA testing that he is
not the biological father of his eldest son, M.C.  M.I. had concealed that
information from him for years. As noted previously, Mr. O. further testified that
M.I. terminated the children’s weekend visits to his apartment in May 2019
because he refused to pay for a vacation for them, then she got upset and told
him to leave when he showed up at one of J.B.’s soccer games. There was no
court order in effect when she took these unilateral steps to prevent him from spending
time with the children.
[200]    M.I. did not testify in the criminal trial, so I have no evidence
from her perspective on any of these issues.  Mr. O.’s evidence is plausible
and uncontradicted, so I accept it.  I conclude that M.I. was actively interfering
with Mr. O.’s ability to co-parent the children in the wake of their separation,
from December 2017 to June 2018, and again from May 2019 onward.
[201]    Based on all the above evidence, I conclude that M.I. had a motive
to falsely accuse Mr. O. of criminal misconduct, namely, to enhance her chances
of prevailing in their custody battle in family court. It is therefore
necessary to scrutinize carefully whether there is any evidence that M.A. may
have been manipulated by her mother to fabricate false allegations against her
father. There is no onus on the Defence to prove manipulation. Rather, the
issue for me to determine is whether there is evidence that gives rise to
reasonable doubt about the veracity of M.A.’s allegations of sexual abuse.
[202]    Having a motive to do something and actually doing it are two
different things.  I have concluded that M.A. was vulnerable to manipulation by
her mother, and that M.I. had a motive to manipulate M.A. into fabricating
false criminal allegations against Mr. O., but there is no evidence whatsoever
that M.I. acted on that motive, or that M.A.’s allegations were the product of
manipulation.
[203]    First and foremost, there is no evidence that M.I. relied on Dr. 
Luthra’s clinical notes in family court, or that she made any allegations of
inappropriate conduct by Mr. O. toward M.A. during the family court proceeding.
 Mr. O. testified at length about family court matters, but he did not state
that M.I. accused him of family violence, child abuse, or any sexually
inappropriate conduct with respect to M.A. in the context of that proceeding.  Furthermore,
the fact that he was so shocked by the charges brought against him in April
2022 suggests that the allegations had not been raised previously in the
context of the family court proceeding.
[204]    Although M.A. acknowledged that in 2018, she was supportive of the
idea that her mother should continue to care for her and her siblings, she specifically
denied telling Dr. Luthra falsehoods to help her mother achieve that outcome in
the court proceeding. She also denied later fabricating serious false allegations
of sexual abuse against her father to thwart the resumption of his parenting
time.  The mere fact that M.A. was supportive of her mother having primary care
of her and her siblings in the spring of 2018 is not evidence of manipulation
by her mother. Rather, it is entirely consistent with M.A.’s allegation that
she was experiencing sexual abuse by her father at that time.
[205]    Defence counsel argues that the timing of M.A.’s ultimate disclosure
of the alleged sexual abuse is suspect because it occurred on the eve of the
resumption of Mr. O.’s parenting time. I reject this argument because M.A.
provided a compelling explanation for the timing of her disclosure during her police
interview.  She knew she was soon going to start seeing her father again. She told
the officer that she was experiencing nightmares, “dreams of him chasing me, dragging
me, hurting me saying I will regret everything.” She said she sought comfort
from her mother when she had these nightmares but did not tell her mother what
the dreams were about. She explained to the officer that, even though she was
scared, she finally got the courage to “open up” and tell the police what her
father had done to her because “I just wanted … you guys to know what I’ve been
going through.  And I want to be in a safer environment.” This testimony is
both credible and convincing.
[206]    For the reasons articulated above, I find that M.I.’s motive to
fabricate false allegations against Mr. O., and M.A.’s susceptibility to
manipulation by M.I., do not raise reasonable doubt about the veracity of
M.A.’s allegations.  There is no evidence that M.I. acted on a motive to
fabricate false claims against Mr. O. in order to gain leverage in the family
court proceeding, and there is no evidence that M.A. was in fact manipulated by
her mother.
[207]    The Defence argues that M.I. is central to the issues in dispute and
that the Crown’s decision not to call her as a witness leaves an evidential gap
in the Crown’s case that gives rise to reasonable doubt about Mr. O.’s guilt.
[208]    In determining whether the Crown has satisfied me of Mr. O.’s guilt,
I am mindful that reasonable doubt can arise not only from the evidence adduced
at trial but also from the absence of evidence at trial: R. v. Lifchus,
1997 CanLII 319 (SCC), [1997] 3 S.C.R. 320, at para. 39; R. v. Hassanzada, 2016 ONCA 284, at
paras. 68-70. Reasonable doubt cannot, however, arise from speculation about
what uncalled evidence might have been, or about why the evidence was not
called: R. v. MacKenzie, 2020 ONCA 646, at paras. 55-58.
[209]    I cannot assume that the Crown decided not to call M.I. because her
testimony would likely have been helpful to the Defence. Nor can I speculate
about what her evidence would have been had she testified. I must, however, consider
whether the absence of any evidence from her gives rise to reasonable doubt
about any of the essential elements of the offences with which Mr. O. is charged.
The Crown has discretion as to which witnesses it will call in presenting its
case, but the failure of the Crown to call a key witness can leave a gap in the
prosecution’s case: R. v. Cook, 1997 CanLII 392 (SCC), [1997] 1 SCR 1113 at para. 30.
[210]    I have concluded that the absence of evidence from M.I. does not detract
from the Crown’s ability to discharge its onus in this case. The totality of
the evidence at trial, especially M.A.’s cogent and compelling testimony, is sufficient
to prove the essential elements of the charged offences beyond a reasonable
doubt. Corroboration of a complainant’s allegations is not required to find an
accused person guilty of a sexual offence: Criminal Code, s. 274. The
absence of evidence from M.I. does not raise reasonable doubt about the
accused’s guilt of any of the offences charged.
[211]    I am mindful of Mr. O.’s fundamental right to be presumed innocent
unless the Crown proves his guilt beyond a reasonable doubt. I cannot convict him
simply because I found deficiencies in his credibility. Nor can I determine his
guilt or innocence simply by choosing between his and M.A.’s competing versions
of events: R. v. C.L.Y., 2008 SCC 2, at paras. 6-8. Verdicts must be
reached by considering all the evidence and the absence of evidence, and by
applying the framework set out by the Supreme Court of Canada in R. v.
W.(D.), at para. 28.
[212]    I do not believe Mr. O.’s exculpatory evidence, nor does it leave me
with reasonable doubt about whether he committed these offences.  I have not
assessed his evidence in isolation but rather in the context of the entirety of
the evidence at trial, including M.A.’s evidence. When weighed against the
totality of the evidence, particularly M.A.’s evidence, Mr. O.’s testimony does
not give rise to reasonable doubt: D. (J.J.R.), at para. 53; R. v.
R.D., 2016 ONCA 574, at paras. 22 and 23.
[213]    For the reasons already outlined above, other potentially
exculpatory evidence does not give rise to reasonable doubt about Mr. O.’s
guilt. Specifically, the evidence relating to opportunity, delayed disclosure,
lack of avoidant behaviour, and motive to lie does not leave me in doubt about his
guilt.  The absence of evidence from M.I. also does not raise reasonable doubt.
[214]    Based on the totality of the evidence that I accept, I find that the
Crown has proven the following beyond a reasonable doubt:
[215]  
The Crown has established all the essential
elements of the charged offences beyond a reasonable doubt.  I therefore
conclude that Mr. O. is guilty of all three charges against him.